Arkansas, session 2025, HB1102.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. APPROPRIATION - GENERAL REVENUE TO CITIES. There is hereby
appropriated, to the Office of the Treasurer of State, to be payable from the
Municipal Aid Fund, for the purpose of distributing General Revenue accruing
therein for the benefit of municipalities as provided by law, by the Office
of the Treasurer of State for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, the
following:

ITEM FISCAL YEAR
NO. 2025-2026
(01) GENERAL REVENUES - CITIES $29,372,099

*JAR025*
03-12-2025 15:36:01 JAR025

As Engrossed: H3/12/25 HB1102
SECTION 2. APPROPRIATION - SPECIAL REVENUES TO CITIES. There is hereby
appropriated, to the Office of the Treasurer of State, to be payable from the
Municipal Aid Fund, for distributing Special Revenues accruing therein for
the benefit of municipalities as provided by law, by the Office of the
Treasurer of State for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, the following:

ITEM FISCAL YEAR
NO. 2025-2026
(01) SPECIAL REVENUES - CITIES $215,000,000

SECTION 3. APPROPRIATION - GENERAL REVENUES TO COUNTIES. There is
hereby appropriated, to the Office of the Treasurer of State, to be payable
from the County Aid Fund, for the purpose of distributing General Revenue
accruing therein for the benefit of counties as provided by law, by the
Office of the Treasurer of State for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026,
the following:

ITEM FISCAL YEAR
NO. 2025-2026
(01) GENERAL REVENUE - COUNTIES $21,428,616

SECTION 4. APPROPRIATION - SPECIAL REVENUES TO COUNTIES. There is
hereby appropriated, to the Office of the Treasurer of State, to be payable
from the County Aid Fund, for the purpose of distributing any monies provided
by Highway Turnback, Severance Taxes to counties, and any other monies
provided by the Acts of the General Assembly for the benefit of counties, by
the Office of the Treasurer of State for the fiscal year ending June 30,
2026, the following:

ITEM FISCAL YEAR
NO. 2025-2026
(01) SPECIAL REVENUE - COUNTIES $230,000,000

SECTION 5. APPROPRIATION - UNANTICIPATED SPECIAL REVENUES - COUNTIES.
There is hereby appropriated, to the Office of the Treasurer of State, to be
payable from the County Aid Fund, for unanticipated monies received from the
03-12-2025 15:36:01 JAR025

As Engrossed: H3/12/25 HB1102
sale or lease of minerals, oil and gas on federal military lands or from
other unanticipated special revenues, for the transfer to those counties to
which such monies are allocated by law, by the Office of the Treasurer of
State for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, the following:

ITEM FISCAL YEAR
NO. 2025-2026
(01) UNANTICIPATED SPECIAL REVENUES $15,000,000

SECTION 6. APPROPRIATION - UNANTICIPATED SPECIAL REVENUES - CITIES.
There is hereby appropriated, to the Office of the Treasurer of State, to be
payable from the Municipal Aid Fund, for unanticipated monies received from
the sale or lease of minerals, oil and gas of federal military lands or from
other unanticipated special revenues, for the transfer to those cities to
which such monies are allocated by law, by the Office of the Treasurer of
State for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, the following:

ITEM FISCAL YEAR
NO. 2025-2026
(01) UNANTICIPATED SPECIAL REVENUES $10,000,000

SECTION 7. APPROPRIATION - REAL PROPERTY TAX REDUCTION - COUNTIES.
There is hereby appropriated, to the Office of the Treasurer of State, to be
payable from the Property Tax Relief Trust Fund, for distributing funds
provided by a statewide property tax reduction to counties, by the Office of
the Treasurer of State for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, the
following:

ITEM FISCAL YEAR
NO. 2025-2026
(01) DISTRIBUTION TO COUNTIES FOR PROPERTY
TAX RELIEF $300,000,000

SECTION 8. APPROPRIATION - PROPERTY TAX RELIEF FUND REVENUES
DISTRIBUTION TO COUNTIES. There is hereby appropriated, to the Office of the
Treasurer of State, to be payable from the Property Tax Relief Trust Fund,
03-12-2025 15:36:01 JAR025

As Engrossed: H3/12/25 HB1102
for accruing therein for the benefit of counties to be distributed using the
formula for the County Aid Fund under §19-5-602(c), by the Office of the
Treasurer of State for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, the following:

ITEM FISCAL YEAR
NO. 2025-2026
(01) DISTRIBUTION TO COUNTIES $2,000,000

SECTION 9. APPROPRIATION - PROPERTY TAX RELIEF FUND REVENUES
DISTRIBUTION TO CITIES. There is hereby appropriated, to the Office of the
Treasurer of State, to be payable from the Property Tax Relief Trust Fund,
for accruing therein for the benefit of municipalities to be distributed
using the formula for the Municipal Aid Fund under §19-5-601(c), by the
Office of the Treasurer of State for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026,
the following:

ITEM FISCAL YEAR
NO. 2025-2026
(01) DISTRIBUTION TO CITIES $2,000,000

SECTION 10. SPECIAL LANGUAGE. NOT TO BE INCORPORATED INTO THE ARKANSAS
CODE NOR PUBLISHED SEPARATELY AS SPECIAL, LOCAL AND TEMPORARY LAW.
DISTRIBUTION OF FUNDS. Funding provided in Property Tax Relief Fund Revenues
Distribution to Counties and Property Tax Relief Fund Revenues Distribution to
Cities of this Act from the Property Tax Relief Trust Fund shall not be
distributed unless there are sufficient funds in the Property Tax Relief Trust
Fund as of the date that the Chief Fiscal Officer of the State certifies the
amount in excess of the required reimbursement to the counties as provided in
§26-26-310(b)(2)(C)(i). If there are sufficient funds remaining in the
Property Tax Relief Trust Fund on December 31, 2024 2025, as certified, the
Treasurer shall distribute two million dollars ($2,000,000) to counties and
two million dollars ($2,000,000) to cities for the fiscal year ending June 30,
2025 2026 from the balance remaining on December 31, 2024 2025 from the
Property Tax Relief Trust Fund. The distribution to counties shall be made in
accordance with the distribution formula in §19-5-602(c). The distribution to
cities shall be made in accordance with the distribution formula in §19-5-
03-12-2025 15:36:01 JAR025

As Engrossed: H3/12/25 HB1102
601(b). The funds attributable to sales and use taxes levied prior to July 1,
2024 2025 shall not be transferred from the Property Tax Relief Trust Fund to
the cities and counties.
The provisions of this section shall be in effect only from July 1, 2024
2025 through June 30, 2025 2026.

SECTION 11. SPECIAL LANGUAGE. NOT TO BE INCORPORATED INTO THE ARKANSAS
CODE NOR PUBLISHED SEPARATELY AS SPECIAL, LOCAL AND TEMPORARY LAW.
LOANS TO CITIES AND COUNTIES. On July 1 of each fiscal year, the Chief
Fiscal Officer of the State shall request a transfer by the State Treasurer
from the Budget Stabilization Trust Fund to the County Aid Fund and to the
Municipal Aid Fund to assist the various cities and counties in meeting cash
flow needs early in the state fiscal year. The transfer shall be a loan to
be repaid in equal installments from general revenue distributions each month
during the fiscal year for which the loan was made and shall be in addition
to any other loans authorized by law for the County Aid and Municipal Aid
Funds. The amount of such loan for each fiscal year shall be $3,517,657 to
the Municipal Aid Fund and $1,906,079 to the County Aid Fund, or so much
thereof as may be available in the Budget Stabilization Trust Fund as
determined by the Chief Fiscal Officer of the State. Upon such transfer
being completed, the State Treasurer shall immediately distribute such funds
to each of the several municipalities and counties in the same manner as
general revenues are distributed.
It is the intent of the General Assembly that the Chief Fiscal Officer of the
State and the State Treasurer shall make every reasonable, and financially
sound effort to insure that local governments receive the full amount of the
loan authorized herein on July 1 of each year and that the monies authorized
for local governments from general revenues be distributed in equal monthly
payments.
The provisions of this section shall be in effect only from July 1, 2024
2025 through June 30, 2025 2026.

SECTION 12. SPECIAL LANGUAGE. NOT TO BE INCORPORATED INTO THE ARKANSAS
CODE NOR PUBLISHED SEPARATELY AS SPECIAL, LOCAL, AND TEMPORARY
LAW. RESPONSIBILITY FOR FUNDING. Beginning on January 1, 2000, each county of
the State shall be responsible for a portion of the cost of regular salaries
03-12-2025 15:36:01 JAR025

As Engrossed: H3/12/25 HB1102
and personal services matching for deputy prosecuting attorneys who are to
become state employees as of January 1, 2000. During the monthly
distribution of general revenues to the counties, the Treasurer of State
shall retain from each county, one-twelfth (1/12th) of 80% of the amount
appropriated by each of the counties for salaries and associated fringe
benefit costs as of January 1, 1999. The amount retained by the Treasurer of
State shall be credited to the State Central Services Fund for the partial
support of the regular salaries and personal services matching costs for
deputy prosecuting attorneys. The amount which each county appropriated for
salaries and associated fringe benefit costs as of January 1, 1999, shall be
determined by the Division of Legislative Audit of the Legislative Joint
Auditing Committee and shall be certified to the Treasurer of State on or
before December 1, 1999.
"Effective July 1, 2024, each Each county shall be responsible for
paying twenty-five percent (25%) of the prior year's amount retained by the
Treasurer of State for that county for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2024
under this section.
The provisions of this section shall be in effect only from July 1,
2024 2025 through June 30, 2025 2026.

SECTION 13. SPECIAL LANGUAGE. NOT TO BE INCORPORATED INTO THE ARKANSAS
CODE NOR PUBLISHED SEPARATELY AS SPECIAL, LOCAL AND TEMPORARY LAW.
CARRY FORWARD. At the close of each fiscal year any unexpended funds for the
County Aid and Municipal Aid line items shall be carried forward and
distributed pursuant and in addition to the funding formula established under
A.C.A 19-5-601 and 19-5-602 within forty-five (45) days.
Any carry forward of unexpended balance of funding as authorized herein,
may be carried forward under the following conditions:
(1) Prior to June 30, 2025 2026 the Agency shall by written statement
set forth its reason(s) for the need to carry forward said funding to the
Department of Finance and Administration Office of Budget;
(2) The Department of Finance and Administration Office of Budget shall
report to the Arkansas Legislative Council all amounts carried forward by the
September Arkansas Legislative Council or Joint Budget Committee meeting
which report shall include the name of the Agency, Board, Commission or
Institution and the amount of the funding carried forward, the program name
03-12-2025 15:36:01 JAR025

As Engrossed: H3/12/25 HB1102
or line item, the funding source of that appropriation and a copy of the
written request set forth in (1) above;
(3) Each Agency, Board, Commission or Institution shall provide a
written report to the Arkansas Legislative Council or Joint Budget Committee
containing all information set forth in item (2) above, along with a written
statement as to the current status of the project, contract, purpose etc. for
which the carry forward was originally requested no later than thirty (30)
days prior to the time the Agency, Board, Commission or Institution presents
its budget request to the Arkansas Legislative Council/Joint Budget
Committee; and
(4) Thereupon, the Department of Finance and Administration shall
include all information obtained in item (3) above in the budget manuals
and/or a statement of non-compliance by the Agency, Board, Commission or
Institution.
The provisions of this section shall be in effect only from July 1, 2024
2025 through June 30, 2025 2026.

SECTION 14. COMPLIANCE WITH OTHER LAWS. Disbursement of funds
authorized by this act shall be limited to the appropriation for such agency
and funds made available by law for the support of such appropriations; and
the restrictions of the State Procurement Law, the General Accounting and
Budgetary Procedures Law, the Revenue Stabilization Law, the Regular Salary
Procedures and Restrictions Act, or their successors, and other fiscal
control laws of this State, where applicable, and regulations promulgated by
the Department of Finance and Administration, as authorized by law, shall be
strictly complied with in disbursement of said funds.

SECTION 15. LEGISLATIVE INTENT. It is the intent of the General
Assembly that any funds disbursed under the authority of the appropriations
contained in this act shall be in compliance with the stated reasons for
which this act was adopted, as evidenced by the Agency Requests, Executive
Recommendations and Legislative Recommendations contained in the budget
manuals prepared by the Department of Finance and Administration, letters, or
summarized oral testimony in the official minutes of the Arkansas Legislative
Council or Joint Budget Committee which relate to its passage and adoption.

03-12-2025 15:36:01 JAR025

As Engrossed: H3/12/25 HB1102
SECTION 16. EMERGENCY CLAUSE. It is found and determined by the
General Assembly, that the Constitution of the State of Arkansas prohibits
the appropriation of funds for more than a one (1) year period; that the
effectiveness of this Act on July 1, 2025 is essential to the operation of
the agency for which the appropriations in this Act are provided, and that in
the event of an extension of the legislative session, the delay in the
effective date of this Act beyond July 1, 2025 could work irreparable harm
upon the proper administration and provision of essential governmental
programs. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this Act
being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health
and safety shall be in full force and effect from and after July 1, 2025.

/s/Joint Budget Committee























03-12-2025 15:36:01 JAR025